Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-417.02
Volunteer fire company or volunteer first-aid, rescue, ambulance, or emergency squad, defined.

Volunteer fire company or volunteer first-aid, rescue, ambulance, or emergency squad shall mean a volunteer association or organization serving any city, village, county, township, or rural or suburban fire protection district in Nebraska by providing fire protection or emergency response services for the purpose of protecting human life, health, or property.

Laws 2002, LB 545, § 39.